Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska28-393
Manslaughter of an unborn child; penalty.

(1) A person commits manslaughter of an unborn child if he or she (a) kills an unborn child without malice upon a sudden quarrel with any person or (b) causes the death of an unborn child unintentionally while in the perpetration of or attempt to perpetrate any criminal assault, any sexual assault, arson, robbery, kidnapping, intentional child abuse, hijacking of any public or private means of transportation, or burglary.

(2) Manslaughter of an unborn child is a Class IIA felony.

Laws 2002, LB 824, § 7;

Laws 2015, LB605, § 23.